North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-03.1 Uniform Premarital Agreement Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2 effective August 1, 2013]

Note.

See now, generally, N.D.C.C. ch. 14-03.2, Uniform Premarital and Marital Agreements Act.

14-03.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.

14-03.1-02.
Formalities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.

14-03.1-03.
Content. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.

14-03.1-04.
Effect of marriage. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.

14-03.1-05.
Amendment — Revocation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.

14-03.1-06.
Enforcement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.

14-03.1-07.
Enforcement of unconscionable provisions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.

14-03.1-08.
Enforcement — Void marriage. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.

14-03.1-09.
Limitation of actions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2.